District of Columbia statutes.
38-841.06

District of Columbia State Athletic Association responsibility.

The District of Columbia State Athletic Association shall coordinate with each applicable school to educate the school, its students, and the students’ guardians regarding National Collegiate Athletic Association eligibility requirements and collegiate athletic scholarships, with particular emphasis on outreach to girls.

Oct. 21, 2015, D.C. Law 21-29, § 7, 62 DCR 10884